Missouri, session 2026, HB2245.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 536.014, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 536.014, to read as follows:
536.014. 1. No department, agency, commission or board rule shall be valid in the
event that:
(1) There is an absence of statutory authority for the rule or any portion thereof; or
(2) The rule is in conflict with state law; or
(3) The rule is so arbitrary and capricious as to create such substantial inequity as to
be unreasonably burdensome on persons affected.
2. No rule proposed by a department, agency, commission, or board shall take
effect unless the entity proposing the rule also repeals at least two of its existing rules.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.